Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 209. Sustainable Agriculture

§ 4701.
Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Program.

The purpose of this section is to promote research and education that will encourage the development and use of economically and ecologically sound sustainable agriculture practices such as organic methods, biological control, integrated pest management, soil improvement, cultivation, harvesting and irrigation techniques, and transportation and marketing innovations, through:

the control of pests and diseases of agricultural importance through alternatives that reduce or eliminate the use of pesticides and petrochemicals.

the production, processing, and distribution of food and fiber in ways that consider the interactions among soils, plants, water, air, animals, tillage, machinery, labor, energy, and transportation to enhance the viability of agricultural soils, public health, and resource conservation.

the expansion of marketing opportunities and promotion of products produced through the practice of sustainable agriculture that will encourage the purchase of Vermont grown foods and promote regional food security; and

the coordination of research and education activities on sustainable agriculture among private and public agencies and individuals within Vermont.

[Repealed.]

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets is authorized to apply for, accept, and make use of grants from public and private sources to achieve the objectives of this section, in accordance with the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

. In awarding grants, preference shall be given to individuals, especially farmers, conducting on-farm research.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 33

, § 16;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 249, 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 61

, § 16.

§§ 4702-4709.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 4710.
Vermont Farm and Forest Viability Program.

The Vermont Farm and Forest Viability Program is a voluntary program established in the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets to provide assistance to Vermont farm, food, and forest-sector businesses to enhance the financial success and long-term viability of Vermont agricultural and forest sectors. In administering the Program, the Secretary shall:

Collaborate with the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to administer the program with other State and federal agencies, private entities, and service groups to develop, coordinate, and provide technical and financial assistance to Vermont farm, food, and forest-sector businesses.

Secure and coordinate experts to assist farm, food, and forest-sector business owners in areas such as business and financial planning, succession planning, diversifying, adopting new technologies, improving product quality, developing value-added products, and lowering costs of production. Providers may include business management specialists, University of Vermont Extension professionals, and other experts to deliver the educational and consulting services.

Encourage agricultural or forest-sector economic development through investing in improvements to essential infrastructure and the promotion of businesses in these sectors.

Enter into agreements with private organizations or individuals or with any agency or instrumentality of the United States or of this State and employ technical experts to carry out the purposes of this section.

The Farm and Forest Viability Program shall be assisted by an advisory board consisting of 12 members who shall include:

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Secretary shall serve as Chair of the Board.

The Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee.

The Commissioner of Economic Development or designee.

The Manager of the Vermont Economic Development Authority or designee.

The Director of University of Vermont Extension or designee.

The Executive Director of the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board or designee.

Four Vermont agricultural or forest-sector business owners appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets in consultation with the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board and the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation. At least two of the four business owners shall be agricultural-sector business owners.

Two people who have expertise in agricultural or forest-sector economics, financing, or business development appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets in consultation with the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board and the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

Members of the Advisory Board established in subsection (b) of this section other than ex officio members shall serve up to three two-year terms and shall be entitled to per diem expenses pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for each day spent in the performance of their duties, and each such member shall be reimbursed for his or her reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out his or her duties under this section.

In consultation with the Advisory Board, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall establish performance goals, performance measures that demonstrate Program results, and other criteria to implement the Program. The criteria shall include at least the following requirements:

the use of funds available to the Program is likely to succeed in improving the economic viability of the business;

the enrollees demonstrate commitment to participating in the Program; and

an evaluation shall be completed by the enrollees.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, and the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, separately or cooperatively, may solicit federal funds, grants, and private contributions for the Farm and Forest Viability Program, but any Vermont Housing and Conservation Board funds used for the Farm and Forest Viability Program shall be administered in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 312

.

In collaboration with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall report in writing to the Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and the House Committees on Agriculture and Forestry and on Commerce and Economic Development on or before January 31 of each year with a report on the activities and performance of the Farm and Forest Viability Program. At a minimum, the report shall include an evaluation of the Program utilizing the performance goals and performance measures established in consultation with the Advisory Board under subsection (d) of this section.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 3, 2004; amended

2005, No. 77

, § 2;

2005, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 11

, § 6;

2017, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.